nursery/apertium-ro-it/dix/consistent-bilBC.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Bilingual dictionary: es-it
	Sections: 2
	Entries: 8975
	Sdefs: 73
	Paradigms: 11
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools cross-param apertium-es-ro.ro.dix -n apertium-es-ro.es-ro.dix -n apertium-es-it.es-it.dix apertium-es-it.it.dix

-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acr" /> 
    <sdef n="predet" /> 
    <sdef n="detnt" /> 
    <sdef n="loc" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" /> 
    <sdef n="cog" /> 
    <sdef n="al" /> 
    <sdef n="atn" /> 
    <sdef n="enc" /> 
    <sdef n="pro" /> 
    <sdef n="tn" /> 
    <sdef n="n" /> 
    <sdef n="np" /> 
    <sdef n="adj" /> 
    <sdef n="f" /> 
    <sdef n="m" /> 
    <sdef n="mf" /> 
    <sdef n="GD" /> 
    <sdef n="sg" /> 
    <sdef n="pl" /> 
    <sdef n="ND" /> 
    <sdef n="adv" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" /> 
    <sdef n="pr" /> 
    <sdef n="prn" /> 
    <sdef n="rel" /> 
    <sdef n="nn" /> 
    <sdef n="an" /> 
    <sdef n="aa" /> 
    <sdef n="ind" /> 
    <sdef n="itg" /> 
    <sdef n="det" /> 
    <sdef n="dem" /> 
    <sdef n="def" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" /> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" /> 
    <sdef n="nt" /> 
    <sdef n="vbser" /> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" /> 
    <sdef n="vblex" /> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" /> 
    <sdef n="inf" /> 
    <sdef n="ger" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" /> 
    <sdef n="pri" /> 
    <sdef n="p1" /> 
    <sdef n="p2" /> 
    <sdef n="p3" /> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="ifi" /> 
    <sdef n="fti" /> 
    <sdef n="cni" /> 
    <sdef n="prs" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="fts" /> 
    <sdef n="imp" /> 
    <sdef n="pos" /> 
    <sdef n="sp" /> 
    <sdef n="ref" /> 
    <sdef n="sup" /> 
    <sdef n="num" /> 
    <sdef n="ij" /> 
    <sdef n="sent" /> 
    <sdef n="cm" /> 
    <sdef n="lpar" /> 
    <sdef n="rpar" /> 
    <sdef n="lquest" /> 
    <sdef n="auxser" /> 
    <sdef n="web" /> 
    <sdef n="apos" /> 
    <sdef n="guio" /> 
    <sdef n="time" /> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>
<pardef n="mil">
  <e>       <i><s n="num"/></i></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="mil(2)">
  <e>       <i></i></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r>mila</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cinquantatré">
  <e>       <p><l><s n="num"/></l><r>é<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/></l><r>emila<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cinquantatré(2)">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>é</r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil</l>   <r>emila</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="cincuenta_y_uno">

  <e>       <p><l><s n="num"/></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="GD"/></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="m"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="f"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="m"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="f"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>
     <!--  <e r="RL"><p><l><b/>mil<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p></e>-->
</pardef>


<pardef n="quarantuno">
  <e>       <i><s n="det"/></i></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mil<s n="num"/></l><r>mila<s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
    

<e>       <p><l>quince</l>                             <r>quindici</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>trece</l>                              <r>tredici</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>doce</l>                               <r>dodici</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>once</l>                               <r>undici</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta</l>                          <r>cinquanta</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuatro</l>                             <r>quattro</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>diez</l>                               <r>dieci</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>dos</l>                                <r>due</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>nueve</l>                              <r>nove</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ocho</l>                               <r>otto</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>seis</l>                               <r>sei</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>siete</l>                              <r>sette</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>tres</l>                               <r>tre</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cinco</l>                              <r>cinque</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta</l>                          <r>cinquanta</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>noventa</l>                            <r>novanta</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>noventa<b/>y<b/>dos</l>                <r>novantadue</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>noventa<b/>y<b/>ocho</l>               <r>novantotto</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>noventa<b/>y<b/>siete</l>              <r>novantasette</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>noventa<b/>y<b/>tres</l>               <r>novantatr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochenta</l>                            <r>ottanta</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochenta<b/>y<b/>cuatro</l>             <r>ottantaquattro</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochenta<b/>y<b/>nueve</l>              <r>ottantanove</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochenta<b/>y<b/>seis</l>               <r>ottantasei</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochenta<b/>y<b/>tres</l>               <r>ottantatr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>                <r>ottantuno</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>setenta<b/>y<b/>cinco</l>              <r>settantacinque</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>setenta<b/>y<b/>dos</l>                <r>settantadue</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>setenta<b/>y<b/>ocho</l>               <r>settantotto</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>setenta<b/>y<b/>siete</l>              <r>settantasette</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>setenta<b/>y<b/>tres</l>               <r>settantatr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>sesenta</l>                            <r>sessanta</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>sesenta<b/>y<b/>cuatro</l>             <r>sessantaquattro</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>sesenta<b/>y<b/>nueve</l>              <r>sessantanove</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>sesenta<b/>y<b/>seis</l>               <r>sessantasei</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>sesenta<b/>y<b/>tres</l>               <r>sessantatr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>sesenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>                <r>sessantuno</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta<b/>y<b/>cuatro</l>           <r>cinquantaquattro</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta<b/>y<b/>nueve</l>            <r>cinquantanove</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta<b/>y<b/>seis</l>             <r>cinquantasei</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta<b/>y<b/>tres</l>             <r>cinquantatr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>              <r>cinquantuno</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>cuatro</l>            <r>quarantaquattro</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>nueve</l>             <r>quarantanove</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>seis</l>              <r>quarantasei</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>tres</l>              <r>quarantatr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>               <r>quarantuno</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>treinta<b/>y<b/>cinco</l>              <r>trentacinque</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>treinta<b/>y<b/>dos</l>                <r>trentadue</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>treinta<b/>y<b/>ocho</l>               <r>trentotto</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>treinta<b/>y<b/>siete</l>              <r>trentasette</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>treinta<b/>y<b/>tres</l>               <r>trentatr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>veinte</l>                             <r>venti</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>veinticuatro</l>                       <r>ventiquattro</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>veintinueve</l>                        <r>ventinove</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>veintiséis</l>                         <r>ventisei</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>veintitrés</l>                         <r>ventitr</r></p><par n="cinquantatré"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>veintiuno</l>                          <r>ventuno</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>diecinueve</l>                         <r>diciannove</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>diecisiete</l>                         <r>diciassette</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>diez</l>                               <r>dieci</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cien</l>                               <r>cento</r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>doscientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>duecento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>trescientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>trecento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>cuatrocientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>quattrocento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>quinientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>cinquecento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>setecientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>settecento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>seiscientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>seicento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>ochocientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>ottocento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><p><l>novecientos<s n="num"/><s n="GD"/></l><r>novecento<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cincuenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>              <r>cinquantuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
<e><p><l>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l><r>quarantuno</r></p><par n="quarantuno"/></e>
<e><p><l>sesenta<b/>y<b/>uno<s n="det"/></l><r>sessantuno<s n="det"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e><p><l>treinta<b/>y<b/>uno<s n="det"/></l><r>trentuno<s n="det"/></r></p><par n="mil"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>noventa<b/>y<b/>uno</l>                <r>novantuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>cuarenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>               <r>quarantuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>sesenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>                <r>sessantuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>setenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>                <r>settantuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>treinta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>                <r>trentuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>ochenta<b/>y<b/>uno</l>                <r>ottantuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
<e>       <p><l>veintiuno</l>                          <r>ventuno</r></p><par n="cincuenta_y_uno"/></e>
